Massachusetts, session 194th, S575.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 34C of chapter 92 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “commission”, in line 12, the
following words:- ; provided, that all revenue generated by motion picture or television
production location fees and contracts shall be transferred to the fund within 60 days of receipt
by the commonwealth.
SECTION 2. Said section 34C of said chapter 92, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by adding the following sentence: Quarterly, the department of conservation and
recreation shall submit a detailed report to the clerk of the house of representatives and the house
committee on ways and means regarding the fund’s financial position including, but not limited
of 2

to: (i) revenue and expenditures of the fund; (ii) sources of revenue and fees; and (iii) details on
any restrictions of the use of funds held in the account.
of 2